Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5577.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) This act may be cited as the "state plane coordinates act". (2) (1) The systems of plane coordinates which that are established by the NOAA/NGS for defining and stating the positions of points on or near the surface of the earth within in this state shall be known and are designated as the Michigan plane coordinate system. of 1927, or MCS 27, and the Michigan coordinate system of 1983, or MCS 83. (2) For the purpose of the use of these systems, the state is divided into a north zone, a central zone, and a south zone. (3) The area included in the following counties constitutes the north zone: Gogebic, Ontonagon, Houghton, Keweenaw, Baraga, Iron, Marquette, Dickinson, Menominee, Alger, Delta, Schoolcraft, Luce, Chippewa, and Mackinac. (4) The area included in the following counties constitutes the central zone: Emmet, Cheboygan, Presque Isle, Charlevoix, Leelanau, Antrim, Otsego, Montmorency, Alpena, Benzie, Grand Traverse, Kalkaska, Crawford, Oscoda, Alcona, Manistee, Wexford, Missaukee, Roscommon, Ogemaw, Iosco, Mason, Lake, Osceola, Clare, Gladwin, and Arenac. (5) The area included in the following counties constitutes the south zone: Oceana, Newaygo, Mecosta, Isabella, Midland, Bay, Huron, Muskegon, Montcalm, Gratiot, Saginaw, Tuscola, Sanilac, Ottawa, Kent, Ionia, Clinton, Shiawassee, Genesee, Lapeer, St. Clair, Allegan, Barry, Eaton, Ingham, Livingston, Oakland, Macomb, Van Buren, Kalamazoo, Calhoun, Jackson, Washtenaw, Wayne, Berrien, Cass, St. Joseph, Branch, Hillsdale, Lenawee, and Monroe. Sec. 1a. As used in this act: (a) "Coordinates" means the x and y plane rectangular coordinate values computed for a geographic position from a pair of mutually perpendicular axes. These axes are the meridian and parallel, defined in sections 5 and 5a, whose intersection defines the origin of each zone. (b) "FGCC" means the federal geodetic control committee of the United States department of commerce or a successor agency to the committee. (b) "Metadata" means data describing other data. Metadata includes, but is not limited to, the geodetic reference system used, applicable epoch, statement of relative accuracy, and date of observation. (c) "Michigan plane coordinate system" means the system of plane coordinates, which has been established by NOAA/NGS, based on the NSRS, and known as the SPCS, for defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points in this state. (d) (c) "NOAA/NGS" means the national oceanic and atmospheric administration/national geodetic survey National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration/National Geodetic Survey or a successor agency to the administration. (e) "NSRS" means the National Spatial Reference System or its successors. (f) "Zone" means the geographic areas encompassed by closed contiguous county boundaries or submerged lands, or both. Sec. 3. The coordinates for a point on or near the earth's surface that are used to express the geographic position of that point in the appropriate zone of this the Michigan plane coordinate system shall must consist of 2 distances. Each distance shall be expressed in United States survey feet (1 foot = 12/39.37 meters) and decimals of a survey foot if using the Michigan coordinate system of 1927, or shall must be expressed in meters and decimals of a meter or in international feet (1 foot = 0.3048 meter exactly) and decimals of an international foot. if using the Michigan coordinate system of 1983. One of these distances, to be known as the "x-coordinate", shall must give the position in an east and west direction; the other distance, to be known as the "y-coordinate", shall must give the position in a north and south direction. The coordinates shall must depend upon on and conform to values published by the NOAA/NGS. for the monumented points of the North American horizontal geodetic control network, the coordinates of which monumented points were computed on the systems designated in this act. Sec. 4. If a tract of land is defined by a single description and extends from 1 zone into another of the coordinate zones described in section 1, zone, the positions of all points on the tract's boundaries may be referred to either of the 2 zones. The zone which that is used for reference shall must be specifically named in the description and identified in the metadata. Sec. 6. Coordinates based on either Michigan coordinate system described in this act, purporting to define the position of a point or a land boundary corner, shall must not be presented to be recorded unless the recording document contains an estimate , expressed as a standard deviation, at the 95% confidence level of the positional tolerance of the coordinates being recorded. The recording document shall also must contain a description of the nearest first or second order horizontal the metadata and geodetic control monument from which the coordinates being recorded were determined and the method of survey for that determination. If the position of the described first or second order geodetic control monument is not published by the NOAA/NGS, the recording document shall contain a certificate signed by a land surveyor licensed under article 20 of the occupational code, Act No. 299 of the Public Acts of 1980, being sections 339.2001 to 339.2014 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, which certificate states that the described control monument and its coordinates have been established and determined in conformance with the specifications given in section 5 or 5a. Sec. 7. (1) The use of the term "Michigan plane coordinate system" of 1927 on a map, report of survey, or other document shall must be limited to coordinates based on the Michigan plane coordinate system of 1927 as defined in section 5.in effect on the date of the survey. The document must contain metadata and the geodetic control monument from which the coordinates being reported were determined and the method of survey for that determination. (2) The use of the term Michigan coordinate system of 1983 on a map, report of survey, or other document shall be limited to coordinates based on the Michigan coordinate system of 1983 as defined in section 5a. Sec. 8. (1) For the purpose of describing A description of the location of a survey station or land boundary corner in the state of Michigan, it shall be considered this state by the Michigan plane coordinate system is a complete, legal, and satisfactory description of that location. to give the position of the survey station or land boundary corner by the Michigan coordinate system of 1927 or the Michigan coordinate system of 1983. (2) If the Michigan plane coordinate system of 1927 or the Michigan coordinate system of 1983 is used to describe a tract of land which in the same document that is also described in the same document by reference to a subdivision, line, or corner of the United States public land surveys, or to a subdivision plat duly recorded in accordance with the subdivision control act of 1967, Act No. 288 of the Public Acts of 1967, being sections 560.101 to 560.293 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, the under the land division act, 1967 PA 288, MCL 560.101 to 560.293, both of the following apply: (a) The description by coordinates shall be construed as is supplemental to the basic description of the subdivision, line, or corner contained in the official plats and field notes filed of record. , and in (b) In the event of a conflict, the description by reference to the subdivision, line, or corner of the United States public land surveys, or to the recorded subdivision plat, shall prevail prevails over the description by coordinates. Sec. 9. The Michigan coordinate system of 1927 shall not be used after December 31, 1989. The Michigan coordinate system of 1983 shall be the sole system used after December 31, 1989.The official geodetic reference system to which geodetic coordinates, including, but not limited to, latitude, longitude, ellipsoid height, orthometric height, or dynamic height, are referenced in this state must be defined by the NSRS. Enacting section 1. Sections 2, 5, and 5a of 1964 PA 9, MCL 54.232, 54.235, and 54.235a, are repealed.